California statutes. Education Code
(B) (i) The plan also shall identify the fund sources, other than the construction grants received under this program, and their respective balances that would be available to cover costs above those projected in the application.

(ii) Any applicant that receives a grant shall cover any costs above those identified in their application to the state using the fund sources identified in clause (i).

(9) (A) An applicant’s student population has unmet demand for housing, as measured by both of the following:

(i) The proportion of students waitlisted for on-campus housing compared to total enrollment.

(ii) Rental vacancy rates for housing in the county for which the student housing project would be located, as defined by the United States Census Bureau.

(B) Applicants shall calculate the data pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) using data for the most recent year available.

(10) A campus shall not apply for a grant to reimburse costs that it has already incurred.

(g) In their submittals to the Department of Finance, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and budget committees of the Legislature, the administering entities shall rank all eligible applications using a composite score of all of the following measures:

(1) State funding per bed for low-income students, with a lower ratio receiving a higher ranking.

(2) Projected rents for low-income student units relative to the limit set forth in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f), with a lower measure receiving a higher ranking.

(3) Project timeline, with an earlier construction start date receiving a higher ranking.

(4) The geographic location of each project. It is the intent of the Legislature that projects selected for a grant are fairly representative of various geographical regions of the state and campuses of the University of California, the California State University, and the California Community Colleges.

(5) Whether the applicant is reapplying with a project that was previously deemed ineligible, with a higher ranking given to the updated project applications that address any issues identified in a previous application.

(6) (A) Unmet demand for housing, with a higher ranking given to projects with either of the following:

(i) Higher proportions of students waitlisted for on-campus housing when compared to total enrollment.

(ii) Lower rental vacancy rates for housing in the county for which the student housing project would be located, as defined by the United States Census Bureau.

(B) Applicants shall calculate the proportions and rates pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) using data for the most recent year available.

(C) For each project, the administering entities shall select the measure determined pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) of subparagraph (A) yielding the highest ranking.

(h) Proposals for student housing projects submitted pursuant to this chapter shall be considered for inclusion in the annual Budget Act or other legislation, subject to an available and sufficient appropriation.

(i) (1) Appropriations provided to support a project included in the annual Budget Act or other legislation pursuant to this chapter shall be considered grants to the applicant for purposes of constructing the project. As a condition of receiving funds pursuant to this chapter, the Regents of the University of California, the Trustees of the California State University, or the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges, or the respective statewide offices for each segment, shall do all of the following:

(A) Provide oversight of the project for which funds are appropriated.

(B) From the receipt of funds to completion of construction for the project, report annually, beginning on or before
 February 1 of the fiscal year immediately following receipt of funding, to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and budget committees of the Legislature, together with the annual report submitted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 66014.6, if applicable, on the status of the project. At a minimum, these reports shall include data on a project’s cost, funding by source, number of beds for low-income students, rents for low-income student beds, the number of standard rent beds and their associated rents, if applicable, building square footage, and project timeline. For each of these data elements that were included in a project’s application to
 the state, the reports shall compare the estimates provided in the application to the most recently available estimates.

(C) Following completion of the project, report annually, beginning on or before February 1 of the year immediately following completion, for a five-year period to the Department of Finance and the relevant policy and budget committees of the Legislature, together with the annual report submitted pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 66014.6, if applicable, on the public benefit provided by the project as related to the selection
 criteria outlined in this chapter. At a minimum, these reports shall include data on a project’s number of beds for low-income students, rents for low-income student beds, the number of standard rent beds and their associated rents, if applicable, annual operating costs and revenues, and housing occupancy rates compared to the campuswide average. For each of these data elements that were included in a project’s application to the state, the reports shall compare the estimates provided in the application to the most recently available estimates.

(2) For a community college project funded pursuant to this chapter, the local community college district may perform the oversight and reporting functions required pursuant to subparagraphs (A) to (C), inclusive, of paragraph (1) in lieu of these functions being performed by the Board of Governors of the California Community Colleges or the office of the Chancellor of the California Community
 Colleges.

(j) For purposes of computing the maintenance of effort for the federal Coronavirus Response and Relief Supplemental Appropriations Act of 2021 (Public Law 116-260), and the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Public Law 117-2), these funds shall be considered fully expended in the year in which they are appropriated, and these funds shall be considered need-based financial aid, as the intent of the program is to reduce nontuition costs for students.

(k) Notwithstanding any other law, including subdivision (j), reduced housing expenses from student housing provided pursuant to this chapter shall augment and not supplant student financial aid from other public sources, and shall not be considered when calculating eligibility for student financial aid.

(l) For the 2022–23 fiscal year, seventeen
 million nine hundred seventy-four thousand dollars ($17,974,000) is hereby appropriated from the General Fund for the purpose of providing planning grants for California Community Colleges that are exploring or determining if it is feasible to offer affordable student rental housing.

(m) The funds appropriated pursuant to subdivision (l) shall be appropriated to the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, to be allocated to the following California Community Colleges, as follows:

(1) One hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Chabot College.

(2) One hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Las Positas College.

(3) One hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for allocation to
 Contra Costa College.

(4) One hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for allocation to Diablo Valley College.

(5) One hundred eighty thousand dollars ($180,000) for allocation to Los Medanos College.

(6) One hundred thirty-two thousand dollars ($132,000) for allocation to De Anza College.

(7) One hundred thirty-two thousand dollars ($132,000) for allocation to Foothill College.

(8) Five hundred eighty thousand dollars ($580,000) for allocation to Ohlone College for two projects.

(9) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Berkeley City College.

(10) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to College of Alameda.

(11) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Laney College.

(12) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Merritt College.

(13) Two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($235,000) for allocation to Evergreen Valley College.

(14) Two hundred thirty-five thousand dollars ($235,000) for allocation to San Jose City College.

(15) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for allocation to the College of San Mateo.

(16) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for allocation to Solano
 Community College.

(17) Three hundred fourteen thousand dollars ($314,000) for allocation to Cerro Coso Community College.

(18) Three hundred fourteen thousand dollars ($314,000) for allocation to Porterville College.

(19) One hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($145,000) for allocation to Merced College.

(20) Five hundred sixty-four thousand dollars ($564,000) for allocation to Merced College for an intersegmental project with the University of California, Merced.

(21) Four hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($449,000) for allocation to Fresno City College.

(22) Four hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($449,000) for
 allocation to Madera College.

(23) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for allocation to West Hills College Coalinga.

(24) Seventy thousand dollars ($70,000) for allocation to Copper Mountain College.

(25) One hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Mt. San Jacinto College.

(26) Five hundred forty thousand dollars ($540,000) for allocation to Moreno Valley College.

(27) Five hundred ninety thousand dollars ($590,000) for allocation to Norco College.

(28) Four hundred seventy thousand dollars ($470,000) for allocation to Riverside City College.

(29) Eight hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($845,000) for allocation to Crafton Hills College.

(30) Eight hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($845,000) for allocation to San Bernardino Valley College.

(31) Two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000) for allocation to Antelope Valley Community College.

(32) Two hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($225,000) for allocation to Cerritos College.

(33) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to El Camino College.

(34) One hundred twenty thousand dollars ($120,000) for allocation to Long Beach City College.

(35) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to East Los Angeles College.

(36) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles City College.

(37) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles Harbor College.

(38) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles Mission College.

(39) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles Pierce College.

(40) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles Southwest College.

(41) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000)
 for allocation to Los Angeles Trade Technical College.

(42) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Los Angeles Valley College.

(43) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to West Los Angeles College.

(44) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for allocation to Cypress College.

(45) Fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) for allocation to Pasadena City College.

(46) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for allocation to Rancho Santiago Community College District.

(47) Five hundred twenty-two thousand dollars ($522,000) for allocation to Rio Hondo College.

(48) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Santa Monica College.

(49) Three hundred twenty-three thousand dollars ($323,000) for allocation to Irvine Valley College.

(50) Four hundred eighty-three thousand dollars ($483,000) for allocation to Saddleback College.

(51) Five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for allocation to Butte College for an intersegmental project with California State University, Chico.

(52) Three hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($349,000) for allocation to Feather River College.

(53) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to American River College.

(54) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Cosumnes River College.

(55) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Folsom Lake College.

(56) One hundred ten thousand dollars ($110,000) for allocation to Sacramento City College.

(57) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for allocation to Mendocino College.

(58) One hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Shasta College.

(59) One hundred fifty-five thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Cuyamaca College.

(60) One hundred fifty-five
 thousand dollars ($155,000) for allocation to Grossmont College.

(61) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for allocation to MiraCosta College.

(62) Eight hundred twenty thousand dollars ($820,000) for allocation to Palomar College.

(63) Three hundred forty-four thousand dollars ($344,000) for allocation to San Diego City College.

(64) Six hundred eighteen thousand dollars ($618,000) for allocation to Southwestern College for five projects.

(65) One hundred eighty-five thousand dollars ($185,000) for allocation to Allan Hancock College.

(66) Two hundred forty-two thousand dollars ($242,000) for allocation to Cabrillo
 Community College.

(67) Three hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($325,000) for allocation to Hartnell College.

(68) One hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000) for allocation to Santa Barbara City College.

(69) Two hundred fifty thousand dollars ($250,000) for allocation to Moorpark College.

(70) Two hundred forty-nine thousand dollars ($249,000) for allocation to Oxnard College.

(n) Commencing with the 2023–24 fiscal year all of the following shall apply:

(1) (A) The General Fund support for the grants provided to campuses of the University of California and the California State University, as
 listed in this section pursuant to Chapters 54 and 572 of the Statutes of 2022, shall revert to the General Fund and the project grants shall instead be funded by revenue bonds issued by the University of California and the California State University.

(B) In addition to the funding for projects pursuant to subparagraph (A) for the University of California, the University of California shall fund construction grants using revenue bond funding issued by the University of California for both of the following projects:

(i) Forty-three million dollars ($43,000,000) for allocation to the University of California, Davis, for the Segundo Infill Student Housing project.

(ii) Forty-three million dollars ($43,000,000) for allocation to the University of California, Santa Barbara, for the East Campus Student Housing
 project.

(C) In addition to the funding for projects pursuant to subparagraph (A) for the University of California, the University of California shall allocate funding for capital outlay planning and construction to finance all of the following projects:

(i) One hundred twenty-six million dollars ($126,000,000) for allocation to the University of California, Riverside, for an intersegmental project with Riverside City College.

(ii) One hundred million dollars ($100,000,000) for allocation to the University of California, Merced, for an intersegmental project with Merced College.

(iii) One hundred eleven million seven hundred eighty-seven thousand dollars ($111,787,000) for allocation to the University of California, Santa Cruz, for an intersegmental
 project with Cabrillo Community College.

(D) (i) In addition to the funding for projects pursuant to subparagraph (A) for the California State University, the California State University shall fund construction grants using revenue bond funding issued by the California State University for all of the following projects:

(I) Eighty-nine million one hundred thousand dollars ($89,100,000) for allocation to the California State University, San Jose.

(II) Forty-one million three hundred forty thousand dollars ($41,340,000) for allocation to the California State University, Sacramento.

(III) Eighteen million eight hundred fifty thousand dollars ($18,850,000) for allocation to the California State University, Stanislaus.

(ii) The California State University shall use seven million four hundred eighty-nine thousand dollars ($7,489,000) in revenue bond funding issued by the California State University to fund cost overruns associated with approved project grants described in subparagraph (A).

(E) Projects funded by revenue bond funds pursuant to this paragraph shall meet all requirements of this chapter.

(2) (A) The General Fund support for the grants provided to campuses of the California Community Colleges, as listed in this section pursuant to Chapters 54 and 572 of the Statutes of 2022, shall revert to the General Fund, and the grants may instead be funded by local financing issued by community college districts for specified projects. A community college that has already received an allocation of resources shall
 revert those General Fund resources upon the community college’s receipt of proceeds derived from amounts borrowed by the State Public Works Board pursuant to any financing program established to support community college affordable student housing projects, or upon the appropriation of funds related to fulfilling the community college’s obligation to revert the allocation it received pursuant to Chapters 54 and 572 of the Statutes of 2022.

(B) In addition to the funding for projects pursuant to subparagraph (A), the California Community Colleges may fund construction grants using local financing issued by community college districts for all of the following projects:

(i) Seventy-five million dollars ($75,000,000) for allocation to San Diego City College.

(ii) Sixty-seven million nine hundred ninety-five thousand
 dollars ($67,995,000) for allocation to Cerritos College.

(iii) Fifty-five million eight hundred fifty-four thousand dollars ($55,854,000) for allocation to the College of San Mateo.

(iv) Twenty-eight million four hundred fifteen thousand dollars ($28,415,000) for allocation to the College of the Redwoods.

(C) In addition to the funding for projects pursuant to subparagraphs (A) and (B), the California Community Colleges may fund construction grants using local financing issued by local community college districts for an additional eighty-one million three hundred forty-three thousand dollars ($81,343,000), subject to future legislation.

(D) Projects funded by local financing pursuant to this paragraph shall meet all requirements of this chapter.

(o) Any project receiving a grant pursuant to this section shall deliver, at a minimum, the number of beds for low-income students specified in its application when it was approved by the state. Rents for these beds shall not exceed the rates assumed in the project’s application. A project may deliver more beds or charge lower rents than assumed in its application if financially feasible.

(p) Intersegmental projects funded through the University of California shall divide the number of beds for low-income students between the participating campuses as specified in the Higher Education Student Housing Grant Program application approved by the state and further defined in the subsequent operating agreements between each University of California campus and the California Community College district partnership.

(q) It is
 the intent of the Legislature that no later than the Budget Act of 2024, a statewide lease revenue bond or other statewide financing or fiscal approach be developed and included to support community college affordable student housing projects that have been approved pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 79, Sec. 2.   (SB 135)   Effective July 13, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

17202.

(a) California community colleges may submit requests for planning grants for campuses that are exploring or determining if it is feasible to offer affordable student rental housing. It is the intent of the Legislature to use up to twenty-five million dollars ($25,000,000) of the total amount described in subdivisions (l) of Section 17201 to support planning grants.

(b) The selection process for planning grants shall include both of the following requirements:

(1) To the extent feasible, ensure a reasonable geographic distribution of funds.

(2) Require that the planning activities related to the proposed affordable student rental housing project be reasonable compared to the costs of comparable projects in the area.

(c) A campus that receives a grant pursuant to this section may use those grant moneys for one or more of the following purposes in connection with an affordable rental student housing project:

(1) Feasibility studies.

(2) Engineering studies.

(3) Financing studies.

(4) Environmental impact studies.

(5) Architectural plans.

(6) Application fees.

(7) Legal services.

(8) Permitting costs.

(9) Bonding.

(10) Site preparation.

(d) A community college applying for a planning grant shall not apply for a construction grant for the same project in the same application cycle.

(e) For purposes of this
 section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Affordable student rental housing” means housing for students that would be charged at below market rate that would be consistent with the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 17201.

(2) “Feasible” means that a project may be accomplished in a successful manner within a reasonable period of time, taking into account economic, environmental, social, and technological factors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 3.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17203.

It is the intent of the Legislature that all laws applicable to an applicant related to the acquisition, design, construction, or renovation of a capital outlay project apply to any student housing project receiving funding under this chapter. This includes, but is not limited to, Section 92495 and applicable provisions of the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code), the Public Contract Code, and this code, including any applicable workforce and labor requirements within those codes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 4.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

17203.5.

(a) The office of the Chancellor of the California State University and the office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall, and the office of the President of the University of California is requested to, collect data on student housing insecurity at each of their respective campuses and submit a report on that data to the Department of Finance and all relevant policy committees on or before March 1, 2023.

(b) The collected data shall include all of the following information:

(1) The number of students who receive housing assistance for on-campus or off-campus housing disaggregated by all of the following:

(A) Gender.

(B) Ethnicity.

(C) The percentage of students who have dependents.

(D) The percentage of students who are first-generation college students.

(E) The percentage of students who are current or former foster youth.

(F) The percentage of students who meet the requirements Section 68130.5.

(G) The distribution of students by age group, income level, gender identity, and LGBTQI+ identity.

(H) The percentage of students who are students with disabilities as identified by the campus.

(I) The percentage of students who are current or former homeless youth.

(J) The percentage of students who identify as LGBTQI+.

(2) The number of students who live on campus and the number of available beds on campus.

(3) The average rental rate for a two-bed dorm room and a two-bedroom apartment on campus.

(4) The average rental rate for a two-bedroom apartment in city or county where the campus is located, if available.

(c) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under subdivision (a) is inoperative on March 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(d) This section
 shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 5.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

17204.

(a) The Higher Education Capacity Expansion Grant Program is hereby established to provide one-time grants for capacity expansion projects to support increased California resident enrollment.

(b) To be eligible for a grant for a capacity expansion project, an applicant shall demonstrate that the project will increase future California resident enrollment capacity, either by increasing instructional space for students or improving students’ time-to-degree, or will otherwise support the applicant’s ability to provide accessible higher education options to more students. Projects may include, but are not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) New construction.

(2) Land or building acquisition.

(3) Modernization of existing buildings for improving the learning environment, improving equipment, increasing classroom capacity, or accommodating more students in high-demand majors and fields.

(c) Proposals for projects to be considered pursuant to this section shall be submitted to the Department of Finance by an established proposal deadline.

(d) The Department of Finance shall provide the Joint Legislative Budget Committee information on all submitted project proposals, and a list of projects proposed for inclusion in the annual Budget Act or other legislation, no later than four months following any proposal deadline established pursuant to subdivision (c).

(e) The University of California and the California State University shall not use a public-private partnership to construct, operate, maintain, or any combination thereof, a project.

(f) As a condition of receiving funding for a project, the University of California shall comply, with respect to the project, with the requirements of Section 92495 applicable to capital outlay projects.

(g) Project selection criteria may include any of the following:

(1) The timeline for project construction, with priority given to projects that can begin the earliest.

(2) The campus’ unmet demand for California resident enrollment, with priority given to applicants with greater unmet California resident demand.

(3) The availability of a local match, with priority given to campuses with a local match.

(4) When considered as a whole, the applications approved pursuant to this section are fairly representative of the various geographical regions of the state and the campuses of the University of California and the California State University.

(5) The campus’ efforts to construct, acquire, or develop collaboratively with its local communities, including
 other public postsecondary educational institutions, capacity expansion projects.

(h) Proposals for capacity expansion projects submitted to the Department of Finance pursuant to this section shall be considered for inclusion in the annual Budget Act or other legislation, subject to an available and sufficient appropriation.

(i) It
 is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate funds for the Higher Education Capacity Expansion Grant Program in a future fiscal year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 54, Sec. 6.   (AB 183)   Effective June 30, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  PART 10.5. SCHOOL FACILITIES [17210. - 17672.]



  CHAPTER 1. Schoolsites [17210. - 17234.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [17210. - 17224.]

17210.

As used in this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Administering agency” means any agency designated pursuant to Section 25502 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Environmental assessor” means an environmental professional as defined in Section 312.10 of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) “Handle” has the meaning the term is given in Article 1 (commencing with Section 25500) of Chapter 6.95 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Hazardous air emissions” means emissions into the ambient air of air contaminants that have been identified as a
 toxic air contaminant by the State Air Resources Board or by the air pollution control officer for the jurisdiction in which the project is located. As determined by the air pollution control officer, hazardous air emissions also means emissions into the ambient air from any substance identified in subdivisions (a) to (f), inclusive, of Section 44321 of the Health and Safety Code.

(e) “Hazardous material” has the meaning the term is given in subdivision (d) of Section 25260 of the Health and Safety Code.

(f) “Operation and maintenance,” “removal action work plan,” “respond,” “response,” “response action,” and “site” have the meanings those terms are given in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78035) of Chapter 1 of the state act.

(g) “Phase I environmental assessment” means a preliminary assessment of a property to
 determine whether there has been or may have been a release of a hazardous material, or whether a naturally occurring hazardous material is present, based on reasonably available information about the property and the area in its vicinity. A phase I environmental assessment shall meet the most current requirements adopted by the American Society for Testing and Materials (ASTM) for Standard Practice for Environmental Site Assessments: Phase I Environmental Site Assessment Process or meet the requirements of Part 312 (commencing with Section 312.1) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations. That ASTM Standard Practice for Environmental Site Assessments or the requirements of Part 312 (commencing with Section 312.1) of Title 40 of the Code of Federal Regulations shall satisfy the requirements of this article for conducting a phase I environmental assessment unless and until the Department of Toxic Substances Control adopts final regulations that establish guidelines for a phase I environmental assessment
 for purposes of schoolsites that impose different requirements.

(h) “Preliminary endangerment assessment” means an activity that is performed to determine whether current or past hazardous material management practices or waste management practices have resulted in a release or threatened release of hazardous materials, or whether naturally occurring hazardous materials are present, which pose a threat to children’s health, children’s learning abilities, public health, or the environment. A preliminary endangerment assessment requires sampling and analysis of a site, a preliminary determination of the type and extent of hazardous material contamination of the site, and a preliminary evaluation of the risks that the hazardous material contamination of a site may pose to children’s health, public health, or the environment, and shall be conducted in a manner that complies with the guidelines published by the Department of Toxic Substances Control
 entitled “Preliminary Endangerment Assessment: Guidance Manual,” including any amendments that are determined by the Department of Toxic Substances Control to be appropriate to address issues that are unique to schoolsites.

(i) “Proposed schoolsite” means real property acquired or to be acquired or proposed for use as a schoolsite, prior to its occupancy as a school.

(j) “Regulated substance” means any material defined in subdivision (i) of Section 25532 of the Health and Safety Code.

(k) “Release” has the same meaning the term is given in Article 3 (commencing with Section 78035) of Chapter 1 of the state act, and includes a release described in paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 78105 of the Health and Safety Code.

(l) “Remedial action
 plan” means a plan approved by the Department of Toxic Substances Control pursuant to Article 12 (commencing with Section 79195) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code.

(m) “State act” means the Carpenter-Presley-Tanner Hazardous Substance Account Act (Part 2 (commencing with Section 78000) of Division 45 of the Health and Safety Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 258, Sec. 11.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2024, pursuant to Sec. 130 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 258.)
-------------------------------------------

17210.1.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law:

(1) For sites addressed by this article for which school districts elect to receive state funds pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10, the state act applies to schoolsites where naturally occurring hazardous materials are present, regardless of whether there has been a release or there is a threatened release of a hazardous material.

(2) For sites addressed by this article for which school districts elect to receive state funds pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10, all references in the state act to hazardous substances shall be deemed to include hazardous materials and all references in the state act to public health shall be deemed to include children’s health.

(3) All risk assessments conducted by school districts that elect to receive state funds pursuant to Chapter 12.5 (commencing with Section 17070.10) of Part 10 at sites addressed by this article shall include a focus on the risks to children’s health posed by a hazardous materials release or threatened release, or the presence of naturally occurring hazardous materials, on the schoolsite.

(4) The response actions selected under this article shall, at a minimum, be protective of children’s health, with an ample margin of safety.

(b) In implementing this article, a school district shall provide a notice to residents in the immediate area prior to the commencement of work on a preliminary endangerment assessment utilizing a format developed by the Department of Toxic Substances Control.

(c) Nothing in this article shall be construed to limit the authority of the Department of Toxic Substances Control or the State Department of Education to take any action otherwise authorized under any other provision of law.

(d) Unless the Legislature otherwise funds its costs for overseeing actions taken pursuant to this article, the Department of Toxic Substances Control shall comply with Chapter 6.66 (commencing with Section 25269) of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code when recovering its costs incurred in carrying out its duties pursuant to this article.

(e) Article 11 (commencing with Section 25220) of Chapter 6.5 of Division 20 of the Health and Safety Code does not apply to schoolsites at which all necessary response actions have been completed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 865, Sec. 1.   Effective October 14, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

17211.

Prior to commencing the acquisition of real property for a new schoolsite or an addition to an existing schoolsite, the governing board of a school district shall evaluate the property at a public hearing using the site selection standards established by the State Department of Education pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 17251. The governing board may direct the district’s advisory committee established pursuant to Section 17388 to evaluate the property pursuant to those site selection standards and to report its findings to the governing board at the public hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17212.

The governing board of a school district, prior to acquiring any site on which it proposes to construct any school building as defined in Section 17283 shall have the site, or sites, under consideration investigated by competent personnel to ensure that the final site selection is determined by an evaluation of all factors affecting the public interest and is not limited to selection on the basis of raw land cost only. If the prospective schoolsite is located within the boundaries of any special studies zone or within an area designated as geologically hazardous in the safety element of the local general plan as provided in subdivision (g) of Section 65302 of the Government Code, the investigation shall include any geological and soil engineering studies by competent personnel needed to provide an assessment of the nature of the site and potential for earthquake or other geologic hazard damage.

The geological and soil engineering studies of the site shall be of such a nature as will preclude siting of a school in any location where the geological and site characteristics are such that the construction effort required to make the school building safe for occupancy is economically unfeasible. No studies are required to be made if the site or sites under consideration have been the subject of adequate prior studies. The evaluation shall also include location of the site with respect to population, transportation, water supply, waste disposal facilities, utilities, traffic hazards, surface drainage conditions, and other factors affecting the operating costs, as well as the initial costs, of the total project.

For the purposes of this article, a special studies zone is an area which is identified as a special studies zone on any map, or maps, compiled by the State Geologist pursuant to Chapter 7.5 (commencing with Section 2621) of Division 2 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1996, Ch. 277, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.   Operative January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

17212.1.

It is the intent of the Legislature that corporations, public utilities, local publicly owned utilities, governmental agencies, and school districts work collaboratively in assessing the safety of a proposed schoolsite or addition to an existing schoolsite.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 578, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

17212.2.

(a) The governing board of a school district may make a written request upon a person, corporation, public utility, local publicly owned utility, or governmental agency for information necessary or useful to assess and determine the safety of a proposed schoolsite or an addition to an existing schoolsite, pursuant to Section 17251 and this chapter, including pipelines, electric transmission and distribution lines, railroads, and storage tanks. The written request shall identify the physical location of the schoolsite for which information is sought, describe the information sought, and contain a statement as to why the information is needed or useful. Information requested may include all of the following:

(1) Railroad operations involving hazardous or toxic materials, as reported to a governmental agency; frequency, speed, and schedule of railroad traffic; grade, curves, and condition of railroad tracks; and railroad accident occurrence.
